Utah statutes.
10-2-708.   Notice of disincorporation -- Publication and filing.
When a municipality has been dissolved, the clerk of the court shall cause a
notice thereof to be published:
(1)  in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county in which the
municipality is located at least once a week for four consecutive weeks; and
(2)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for four weeks.
